Hawaii statutes.
§441-19 Powers and duties of director.
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the director,
pursuant to chapter 91 shall:

(1) Grant licenses to cemetery and pre-need funeral
authorities pursuant to this chapter and rules adopted pursuant thereto;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules as the director
deems proper to fully effectuate this chapter and carry out the purpose
thereof, which is the protection of the general public in its acquisitions of
cemetery property, pre-need interment services, at-need funeral services, and
pre-need funeral services. The rules may forbid acts or practices deemed by
the director to be detrimental to the accomplishment of the purpose of this
chapter, and the rules may require mortuary, cemetery, and pre-need funeral
authorities to make reports to the director containing such information as will
better enable the director to enforce this chapter and the rules, or as will
better enable the director from time to time to amend the rules to more fully
effectuate the purpose of this chapter. The rules may also require mortuary,
cemetery, and pre-need funeral authorities to furnish reports to their clients
containing such matters of information as the director deems necessary to
promote the purpose of this chapter; provided that this enumeration of specific
matters which may properly be made the subject of rules shall not be construed
to limit the director's broad general power to make all rules necessary to
fully effectuate the purpose of this chapter;

(3) Enforce this chapter and rules adopted pursuant
thereto;

(4) Fine, suspend, or revoke any license for any
cause prescribed by this chapter, or for any violation of the rules, and refuse
to grant any license for any cause that would be grounds for revocation or
suspension of a license;

(5) Report to the governor annually and at such other
times and in such other manner as the governor may require concerning the
director's activities;

(6) Publish and distribute pamphlets and circulars
containing such information as the director deems proper to further the
accomplishments of the purpose of this chapter;

(7) Investigate the actions of any person acting in
the capacity of a licensee under this chapter if there is reason to believe
that there may be a violation of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant
thereto;

(8) Extend the deadline for, or defer the filing of,
any periodic report required under this chapter, provided that the licensee
meets the conditions and requirements set forth by the director in rules; and

(9) Provide in the rules for alternatives to any
bonding or insurance requirement imposed by this chapter when a bond or
insurance cannot reasonably be secured and the alternative measures provide for
the same degree of protection to the consumer. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS
§441-19; am L 1969, c 242, §2; am L 1975, c 21, §4; am L 1981, c 221, §4; am L
1985, c 101, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 35, §1; am L 1992, c 202, §50]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next